Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-203
Commissions; enlistments; qualifications.

No person shall be appointed or enlisted in such forces who is not a citizen of the United States or who has been expelled or dishonorably discharged from any military or naval organization of this state or of another state or of the United States.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 9, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-409;

R.S.1943, § 55-203;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 79, p. 1606.